Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 121.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Architect” means a person who is licensed to practice architecture under this chapter.

“Board” means the “Vermont Board of Architecture.”

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken against a licensee by the Board or on appeal from the Board, when that action suspends, revokes, limits, or conditions a license in any way, and includes reprimands and dismissals.

“Plans” or “working drawings” mean any drawings or graphic representations or any combination of drawings or graphic representations, or reproductions thereof, prepared for the purpose of illustrating proposed or intended designs for the construction, enlargement, or alteration of any building or project.

The “practice of architecture” means providing professional services such as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, designing (including structural design), or responsible supervision of construction in connection with any building or structure that has as its principal purpose human occupancy or habitation.

“Responsible control” means that amount of control over and detailed knowledge of the content of technical submissions during their preparation as is ordinarily exercised by licensed architects applying the required professional standard of care.

“Supervision” means work prepared under the regular, personal review of a licensed architect’s control and as to which the architect has detailed professional knowledge.

“Technical submissions” means designs, drawings, specifications, studies, and other technical reports prepared in the course of executing a portion of a construction project.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 52

, § 5a;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 122.
Prohibitions; penalties.

No person shall:

practice or attempt to practice architecture or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State without first having obtained the license required by this chapter;

use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, title, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is an architect unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter;

practice or attempt to practice architecture during license revocation or suspension;

stamp or seal any documents with their architect’s seal if their license to practice architecture has expired or is revoked; or

violate any of the provisions of this chapter.

A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

Injunctive relief will be available on application of the Office of Attorney General or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation, pursuant to a complaint filed in the Superior Court of Washington County to restrain violations of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 27

, § 15;

2007, No. 29

, § 16.

§ 123.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 124.
Construction; exemptions.

This chapter shall not be construed to affect or prevent:

the practice of engineering by a professional engineer licensed under the laws of this State;

the preparation of working drawings, details, and shop drawings by persons other than architects for use in connection with the execution of their work;

employees of those lawfully practicing as architects under the provisions of this chapter from acting under the instruction, control, or supervision of their employers;

supervision by builders or superintendents employed by such builders, of the construction or structural alteration of buildings or structures;

design and construction, and the provision of services related thereto, of the following if the structure is:

a detached single, two-family, three-family, or four-family dwelling, or a shed, storage building, or garage incidental to that dwelling;

a farm building, including barns, silos, sheds, or housing for farm equipment and machinery, livestock, poultry, or storage; or

a pre-engineered building, or a building, plans for which have been stamped or sealed by a licensed professional in the appropriate field.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit any person not licensed as provided in this chapter to use the title architect, or any title, sign, card, or device to indicate that such person is an architect.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the right of a practitioner of another profession or occupation from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions incidental to that profession or occupation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.